Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.16, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Statewide hospitality fee. Every person, firm, or corporation that operates a licensed boarding establishment, food and beverage service establishment, seasonal temporary or permanent food stand, deleted text begin special event food stand,deleted text end mobile food unit, food cart, resort, hotel, motel, or lodging establishment in Minnesota must submit to the commissioner a $40 annual statewide hospitality fee for each licensed activity. The fee for establishments licensed by the Department of Health is required at the same time the licensure fee is due. For establishments licensed by local governments, the fee is due by July 1 of each year. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end